Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2844
Signature, defined.

Signature means the name, word, or mark of a person written in his or her own hand with the intent to authenticate a writing or other form of communication or a digital signature which complies with section 86-611 or an electronic signature.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 940.